Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.32
Nebraska Capitol Commission; creation;
members; appointment; expenses.

The Nebraska Capitol Commission
is hereby created. The commission shall consist of the Governor, the Speaker
of the Legislature, the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court, the dean of the College of Architecture
at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, the Director of the Nebraska State
Historical Society, and three other residents of Nebraska appointed by the
Governor. One appointive member shall be appointed from each congressional
district. The terms of the appointive members shall be staggered so that one
term expires on March 1, 1994, one term expires on March 1, 1995, and one
term expires on March 1, 1996. As the terms of the appointive members expire,
the Governor shall, on or before March 1 of each year, appoint or reappoint
a member of the commission for a term of three years to succeed the member
whose term expires. Any member appointed after March 1 shall serve for the
remaining portion of the three-year term.

The Governor shall serve as the chairperson of the Nebraska Capitol
Commission, the Speaker of the Legislature shall serve as the vice-chairperson
of the commission, and the State Capitol Administrator or his or her representative
shall serve as the nonvoting secretary of the commission.

In the absence of the Governor, he or she may designate the Lieutenant
Governor as his or her representative. In the absence of the Speaker of the
Legislature, he or she may designate the chairperson of the Executive Board
of the Legislative Council or the Clerk of the Legislature as his or her representative. In the absence of the Chief Justice of
the Supreme Court, he or she may designate the State Court Administrator as
his or her representative. Representatives of the Governor, the Speaker of the Legislature, and the Chief Justice shall have full voting
privileges for the meeting in attendance.

The members of such commission shall be reimbursed for their actual
and necessary expenses while away from home engaged in the performance of
their duties as members of the commission as provided in sections 81-1174
to 81-1177.

Laws 1949, c. 211, § 1, p. 601;

Laws 1965, c. 440, § 1, p. 1396;

R.R.S.1943, § 72-716;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 23;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 189;

Laws 1993, LB 311, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 297, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 25;

Laws 2005, LB 684, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB752, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1116, § 1.